Nebraska, session 109, LB285.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB285 LB285
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-1418.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
28-1418.01 For purposes of sections 28-1418 to 28-1429.07 and
section 4 of this act:
(1) Alternative nicotine product means any noncombustible product
containing nicotine that is intended for human consumption, whether
chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or ingested by any other means. Alternative
nicotine product does not include any electronic nicotine delivery
system, cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco product, or any product
regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug
Administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act;
(2) Cigarette means any product that contains nicotine, is intended
to be burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of
or contains (a) any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance
not containing tobacco, (b) tobacco, in any form, that is functional in
the product which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in
the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or
purchased by, consumers as a cigarette, or (c) any roll of tobacco
wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which, because of its
appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and
labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a
cigarette described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section;
(3) Delivery sale means to sell, give, or furnish products (a) by
mail or delivery service, (b) through the Internet or a computer network,
(c) by telephone, or (d) through any other electronic method;
(4)(a) Electronic nicotine delivery system means any product or
device containing nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives that employs
a heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic,
chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, to simulate
smoking by delivering the nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in
-2-

LB285 LB285
2025 2025
vapor, fog, mist, gas, or aerosol form to a person inhaling from the
product or device.
(b) Electronic nicotine delivery system includes, but is not limited
to, the following:
(i) Any substance containing nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco
derivatives, whether sold separately or sold in combination with a
product or device that is intended to deliver to a person nicotine,
tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in vapor, fog, mist, gas, or aerosol
form;
(ii) Any product or device marketed, manufactured, distributed, or
sold as an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo,
electronic pipe, electronic hookah, or similar products, names,
descriptors, or devices; and
(iii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device
that is used during operation of the product or device when sold in
combination with any substance containing nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco
derivatives.
(c) Electronic nicotine delivery system does not include the
following:
(i) An alternative nicotine product, cigarette, cigar, or other
tobacco product, or any product regulated as a drug or device by the
United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or
(ii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device
that is used during operation of the product or device when not sold in
combination with any substance containing nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco
derivatives;
(5) Self-service display means a retail display that contains a
tobacco product, a tobacco-derived product, an electronic nicotine
delivery system, or an alternative nicotine product and is located in an
area openly accessible to a retailer's customers and from which such
-3-

LB285 LB285
2025 2025
customers can readily access the product without the assistance of a
salesperson. Self-service display does not include a display case that
holds tobacco products, tobacco-derived products, electronic nicotine
delivery systems, or alternative nicotine products behind locked doors;
and
(6) Tobacco specialty store means a retail store that (a) derives at
least seventy-five percent of its revenue from tobacco products, tobacco-
derived products, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative
nicotine products and (b) does not permit persons under the age of
twenty-one years to enter the premises unless accompanied by a parent or
legal guardian.
Sec. 2. Section 28-1425, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1425 Any licensee who shall sell, give, or furnish in any way to
any person under the age of twenty-one years, or who shall willingly
allow to be taken from his or her place of business by any person under
the age of twenty-one years, any cigars, tobacco, cigarettes, cigarette
material, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine
products is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Any officer, director, or
manager having charge or control, either separately or jointly with
others, of the business of any corporation which violates sections
28-1419, 28-1420 to 28-1429, and 28-1429.03 to 28-1429.07 and section 4
of this act, if he or she has knowledge of such violation, shall be
subject to the penalties provided in this section. In addition to the
penalties provided in this section, such licensee shall be subject to the
additional penalty of a revocation and forfeiture of his, her, their, or
its license, at the discretion of the court before whom the complaint for
violation of such sections may be heard. If such license is revoked and
forfeited, all rights under such license shall at once cease and
terminate and a new license shall not be issued until the expiration of
the period provided for in section 28-1429.
-4-

LB285 LB285
2025 2025
Sec. 3. Section 28-1429, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1429 (1) If a license issued under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 is
revoked and forfeited as provided in section 28-1425 for a violation of
section 28-1429.04 or 28-1429.05, no new license shall be issued to such
licensee until the expiration of five years after the date of such
revocation and forfeiture.
(2) If a license issued under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 is revoked
and forfeited as provided in section 28-1425 for any other violation of
sections 28-1418 to 28-1429.03, 28-1429.06, and 28-1429.07 and section 4
of this act, no new license shall be issued to such licensee until the
expiration of one year after the date of such revocation and forfeiture
except as otherwise provided in section 28-1423.
Sec. 4. (1) For purposes of this section, flavored vapor product
means an electronic nicotine delivery system:
(a) That has a taste or smell, other than the taste or smell of
tobacco or menthol, that is distinguishable by an ordinary consumer
either prior to or during consumption or use of the product or device,
including, but not limited to, any taste or smell relating to mint,
wintergreen, chocolate, cocoa, vanilla, or honey or any fruit, candy,
dessert, alcoholic beverage, herb, or spice;
(b) That is marketed as having any taste or smell other than tobacco
or menthol; or
(c) Regarding which the manufacturer, seller, or any person
authorized by, or acting with the consent of, the manufacturer or seller,
has made a public statement or claim, whether express or implied, that
such electronic nicotine delivery system has a taste or smell other than
tobacco or menthol.
(2) A person holding a license under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429
shall not market, advertise, sell, or cause to be sold any flavored vapor
product.
-5-

LB285 LB285
2025 2025
Sec. 5. Section 59-1523, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
59-1523 (1) The cigarette tax division of the Tax Commissioner may,
after notice and hearing, revoke or suspend for any violation of section
59-1520 the:
(a) License or licenses of any person licensed under sections
28-1418 to 28-1429.07 and section 4 of this act or sections 77-2601 to
77-2622; or
(b) License or certification of any person licensed or certified
under the Tobacco Products Tax Act.
(2) Cigarettes that are acquired, held, owned, possessed,
transported, sold, or distributed in or imported into this state in
violation of section 59-1520 are declared to be contraband goods and are
subject to seizure and forfeiture. Any cigarettes so seized and forfeited
shall be destroyed. Such cigarettes shall be declared to be contraband
goods whether the violation of section 59-1520 is knowing or otherwise.
Sec. 6. Section 77-4001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4001 Sections 77-4001 to 77-4025 and section 7 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Tobacco Products Tax Act.
Sec. 7. (1) For purposes of this section, flavored vapor product
has the same meaning as in section 4 of this act.
(2) The Tax Commissioner shall not issue a certification under
section 77-4011.01 for any electronic nicotine delivery system which is a
flavored vapor product.
(3) A manufacturer shall not cause to be sold at retail in this
state any type or model of electronic nicotine delivery system which is a
flavored vapor product.
Sec. 8. Original sections 28-1418.01, 28-1425, 28-1429, 59-1523,
and 77-4001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-6-